Illinois, session 104th, HB1052.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Food 5Truck Freedom Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act: 7    "Food truck" means a fully encased food service 8establishment: 9        (1) on a motor vehicle or on a trailer that a motor 10    vehicle pulls to transport; and 11        (2) from which a food truck vendor, standing within 12    the frame of the vehicle or trailer, prepares, cooks, 13    sells, or serves food or beverages for immediate human 14    consumption. 15    "Food truck" does not include a food cart or an ice cream 16truck. 17    Section 10. Food truck license or permitting scheme. A 18municipality, county, or township may create a license or 19permitting scheme for a food truck to operate within its 20jurisdiction. 21    Section 15. Effect of license or permit from another   HB1052- 2 -LRB104 03592 RTM 13616 b1jurisdiction.2    (a) A food truck license or permit obtained from a 3municipality, county, or township in Illinois has full force 4and effect in all other jurisdictions in Illinois so long as 5that license or permit was issued after: 6        (1) an inspection by a local health department that 7    uses recommendations made by the Food and Drug 8    Administration concerning food trucks; and 9        (2) an inspection by a local fire department or local 10    fire protection district that uses recommendations made by 11    the National Fire Prevention Association concerning food 12    trucks. 13    (b) Nothing in this Section prevents a municipality, 14county, or township from imposing placement or zoning 15restrictions or fees so long as those restrictions and fees 16are uniformly applied to all food trucks, regardless of the 17food truck's license or permit jurisdiction. 18    Section 90. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 19food trucks in a manner inconsistent with this Act. This Act is 20a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII 21of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by 22home rule units of powers and functions exercised by the 23State. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 251, 2026.